Utah statutes.
79-3-203.   Director of survey -- Designation as state geologist -- Qualifications -- Duties and authority.

(1)  The director is:

(a)  the executive and administrative head of the survey; and

(b)  designated the state geologist.

(2)  The director's qualifications shall include:

(a)  graduation from a recognized university; and

(b)  demonstrated competency in:

(i)  the science of geology; and

(ii)  administration.

(3) (a)  The director administers the survey for the benefit of the public.

(b)  A person may not call upon or require the director or his associates to enter upon any special survey for the benefit of that person.

(4)  The director, subject to review by the board and approval by the executive director of the department, may initiate cooperative agreements with private companies or parties or state or federal agencies to carry out the provisions of this chapter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

